dev/monodix/result.id.dix
    <pardef n="mengalirkannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengalirnya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mempersalin__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mempersalini__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mempersalinnya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mempersalinkan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mempersalinkannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mempersalinnya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengaliri__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="si"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengalirinya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="si"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berbicara__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ber"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berhubungan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ber-an"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berkewajiban__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ber"/><s n="ke-an"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berpenampilan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ber"/><s n="peN-an"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bacanya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dibaca__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dialirkan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dialirkannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dibacanya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperbuat__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperhiasi__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperhiasinya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperebutkan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperebutkannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperbuatnya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dialiri__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="si"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dialirinya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="si"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="baca-baca__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="red"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="baca-bacanya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="red"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberadaan-keberadaan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberadaan-keberadaannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberadaan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keberadaannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="ber"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepejuangan-kepejuangan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pe"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepejuangan-kepejuangannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pe"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepejuangan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pe"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kepejuangannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pe"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kependiaman-kependiaman__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kependiaman-kependiamannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kependiaman__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kependiamannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kebakaran-kebakaran__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kebakaran-kebakarannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kebakaran__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kebakarannya__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="lirik"><p><l>lirik-lirik</l><r>lirik</r></p><par n="baca-baca__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="semak"><p><l>semak-semak</l><r>semak</r></p><par n="baca-baca__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="keluar"><p><l>keluarnya</l><r>keluar</r></p><par n="bacanya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="runtuh"><p><l>runtuhnya</l><r>runtuh</r></p><par n="bacanya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kecamuk"><p><l>berkecamuk</l><r>kecamuk</r></p><par n="berbicara__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sujud"><p><l>bersujud</l><r>sujud</r></p><par n="berbicara__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="jual"><p><l>berjualan</l><r>jual</r></p><par n="berhubungan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="papas"><p><l>berpapasan</l><r>papas</r></p><par n="berhubungan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sempat"><p><l>berkesempatan</l><r>sempat</r></p><par n="berkewajiban__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wajib"><p><l>berkewajiban</l><r>wajib</r></p><par n="berkewajiban__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tampil"><p><l>berpenampilan</l><r>tampil</r></p><par n="berpenampilan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="jumpa"><p><l>dijumpai</l><r>jumpa</r></p><par n="dialiri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tabur"><p><l>ditaburi</l><r>tabur</r></p><par n="dialiri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lalu"><p><l>dilaluinya</l><r>lalu</r></p><par n="dialirinya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="temu"><p><l>ditemuinya</l><r>temu</r></p><par n="dialirinya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kalah"><p><l>dikalahkan</l><r>kalah</r></p><par n="dialirkan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pamer"><p><l>dipamerkan</l><r>pamer</r></p><par n="dialirkan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="luncur"><p><l>diluncurkannya</l><r>luncur</r></p><par n="dialirkannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="temu"><p><l>ditemukannya</l><r>temu</r></p><par n="dialirkannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="halau"><p><l>dihalau</l><r>halau</r></p><par n="dibaca__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="putar"><p><l>diputar</l><r>putar</r></p><par n="dibaca__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="capai"><p><l>dicapainya</l><r>capai</r></p><par n="dibacanya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="raih"><p><l>diraihnya</l><r>raih</r></p><par n="dibacanya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kenan"><p><l>diperkenankan</l><r>kenan</r></p><par n="diperebutkan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="temu"><p><l>dipertemukan</l><r>temu</r></p><par n="diperebutkan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kenal"><p><l>diperkenalkannya</l><r>kenal</r></p><par n="diperebutkannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ingat"><p><l>diperingati</l><r>ingat</r></p><par n="diperhiasi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="putus"><p><l>keputusan-keputusan</l><r>putus</r></p><par n="kebakaran-kebakaran__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hadir"><p><l>kehadiran</l><r>hadir</r></p><par n="kebakaran__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="menang"><p><l>kemenangan</l><r>menang</r></p><par n="kebakaran__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wajib"><p><l>kewajibannya</l><r>wajib</r></p><par n="kebakarannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ada"><p><l>keberadaannya</l><r>ada</r></p><par n="keberadaannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rawat"><p><l>keperawatan</l><r>rawat</r></p><par n="kepejuangan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="urus"><p><l>kepengurusan</l><r>urus</r></p><par n="kependiaman__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pimpin"><p><l>kepemimpinannya</l><r>pimpin</r></p><par n="kependiamannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ingat"><p><l>memperingati</l><r>ingat</r></p><par n="mempersalini__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lihat"><p><l>memperlihatkan</l><r>lihat</r></p><par n="mempersalinkan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tunjuk"><p><l>mempertunjukkan</l><r>tunjuk</r></p><par n="mempersalinkan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kenal"><p><l>memperkenalkannya</l><r>kenal</r></p><par n="mempersalinkannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hubung"><p><l>menghubungi</l><r>hubung</r></p><par n="mengaliri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="liput"><p><l>meliputi</l><r>liput</r></p><par n="mengaliri__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kenal"><p><l>mengenalinya</l><r>kenal</r></p><par n="mengalirinya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lindung"><p><l>melindunginya</l><r>lindung</r></p><par n="mengalirinya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kirim"><p><l>mengirimkannya</l><r>kirim</r></p><par n="mengalirkannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="temu"><p><l>menemukannya</l><r>temu</r></p><par n="mengalirkannya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cari"><p><l>mencarinya</l><r>cari</r></p><par n="mengalirnya__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="paksa"><p><l>memaksanya</l><r>paksa</r></p><par n="mengalirnya__vblex"/></e>
